California statutes. Labor Code
(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 131.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

270.6.

(a) No person, or agent or officer thereof, without a permanent and fixed place of business or residence in this state who uses or employs any person in the door-to-door selling of any merchandise, in any similar itinerant activity, or in any telephone solicitation, shall fail or neglect, before commencing work in any period for which any single payment of wages is made or for four calendar weeks, whichever is longer, to do any one of the following:

(1) Have on hand or on deposit with a bank or trust company in the county where the business is conducted, or if there is no bank or trust company in the county, then in the bank or trust company nearest these operations, cash or readily salable securities of a market value sufficient to pay the wages of every person employed in connection with these operations for that period described in this subdivision.

(2) Deposit with the Labor Commissioner the bond of a surety company authorized to do business within the state, acceptable to the Labor Commissioner, conditioned upon the payment of all wages found to be due and unpaid in connection with these operations under any provision of this code.

(3) Deposit with the Labor Commissioner a time certificate of deposit indicating that the person, agent, or officer subject to this section has deposited with a bank or trust company cash payable to the order of the Labor Commissioner sufficient to pay the wages of every person employed in connection with these operations for that period described in this subdivision.

(b) The cash and securities on deposit referred to in subdivision (a) shall not be commingled with other deposits, securities, or property of the employer and shall be held in trust and shall not be used for any other purpose than paying the wages due employees. The moneys so held in trust are not subject to enforcement of a money judgment by any other creditor of the employer.

(c) Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 538, Sec. 481.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

271.

No person, or agent or officer thereof, engaged in the business of promoting a theatrical enterprise where living individuals are used or employed in the presentation, except persons having a free and unencumbered title to the fee of the property on which the theatrical enterprise is produced, shall fail or neglect, before producing such enterprise in any period for which a single payment of wages is made, to have on hand or on deposit with a bank or trust company, in the county in which such enterprise is to be produced, or if there is no bank or trust company in the county, then in the bank or trust company nearest the place where such enterprise is produced, cash or readily salable securities of a market value sufficient to pay the wages of every individual used or employed in the production of such enterprise, or in connection therewith for such period. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the use or employment of individuals by a radio or television broadcasting enterprise; provided, there is on hand or on deposit with a bank or trust company in this State cash or readily salable securities of a market value sufficient to pay the wages of every individual used or employed in such enterprise, or in connection therewith.

Theatrical enterprise as used in this section means the production of any circus, vaudeville, carnival, revues, variety shows, musical comedies, operettas, opera, drama, theatrical, endurance contest, walkathon, marathon, derby, or other entertainments, exhibitions, or performances.

Any person, or agent or officer thereof, who violates this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1945, Ch. 628.)
-------------------------------------------

272.

Every person, agent, or officer thereof engaged in the businesses specified in Section 270, 270.5, 270.6, or 271, shall keep conspicuously posted upon the premises where persons are employed, a notice specifying the name and address of the bank or trust company where the required cash or readily salable securities are on deposit, or the name of the surety or sureties on the bond deposited pursuant to Section 270.5 or 270.6. Failure to keep the notice conspicuously posted is prima facie evidence of a violation of Section 270, 270.5, 270.6, or 271.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1965, Ch. 329.)
-------------------------------------------

273.

(a) The following definitions apply for purposes of this section:

(1) “All activities relating to an adverse license or registration action” includes, but is not limited to, all of the following which occur as a result of a failure to comply with this section:

(A) Denial of a new application or a renewal application for licensure or registration.

(B) Denial of reinstatement of a license or registration.

(C) Suspension of a license or registration.

(D) Assessment and
 recovery of civil penalties for knowingly providing false information in the statement required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) “Farm labor contractor” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1682.

(3) “Final judgment issued by a court” means a judgment with respect to which all possibility of a direct attack, by way of appeal, motion for a new trial, or motion pursuant to Section 663 of the Code of Civil Procedure to vacate the judgment, has been exhausted and also includes any final arbitration award where the time to file a petition for a trial de novo or a petition to vacate or correct the arbitration award has expired, and no petition is pending.

(4) “Garment manufacturer” means a person engaged in garment manufacturing as described in Section 2671.

(5) “Involving unpaid wages” means all amounts required to be paid by a final judgment, order, or accord involving a failure of the licensee or registrant to pay required wages.

(6) “Licensee” has the same meaning as set forth in Section 1682.

(7) “Registrant” means a person who holds a valid and unrevoked garment manufacturer registration.

(b) (1) The Labor Commissioner shall require an applicant for any of the following to submit a statement as to whether the applicant has satisfied all requirements imposed by a final judgment issued by a court or by a final order issued by the Labor Commissioner or by an accord involving unpaid wages:

(A) Licensure as a farm labor
 contractor.

(B) Registration as a garment manufacturer.

(C) Renewal or reinstatement of a farm labor contractor license or a garment manufacturer registration.

(D) A change in the persons identified pursuant to Section 1689 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2675.

(2) A person who knowingly provides false information in the statement submitted pursuant to this subdivision shall be subject to a civil penalty of no less than one thousand dollars ($1,000) and no more than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000), in addition to any civil remedies available to the Labor Commissioner. The penalty shall be recovered by the Labor Commissioner as part of a hearing relating to a denial of an application for a license or
 registration, a hearing relating to a denial of a renewal or reinstatement of a license or registration, a hearing to contest the civil penalties assessed under this section by the Labor Commissioner, or in an independent civil action. The action shall be brought in the name of the people of the State of California and the Labor Commissioner and the attorneys thereof may proceed and act for and on behalf of the people in bringing these actions.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the Labor Commissioner shall not approve an application described in subdivision (b) if the statement submitted with it shows that the applicant has failed to satisfy all requirements imposed by a final judgment issued by a court or by a final order issued by the Labor Commissioner or by an accord involving unpaid wages, as described in subdivision (b), unless the applicant submits either of the following to the Labor Commissioner:

(1) A bond or a cash deposit, in addition to any required by Section 240, 1684, 1688, 2675, or 2679, in an amount sufficient to guarantee payment of all amounts due under a final judgment issued by a court or under a final order issued by the Labor Commissioner involving unpaid wages.

(2) A notarized accord between the applicant and the other parties to the judgment, order, or accord demonstrating that the applicant has satisfied all requirements imposed by the judgment, order, or accord involving unpaid wages.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, if the Labor Commissioner determines after granting an application described in subdivision (b) that the applicant made a false representation on the statement he or she submitted, the Labor Commissioner shall suspend the farm labor contractor license or garment
 manufacturer registration effective on the date of its issuance, renewal, or reinstatement. The license or registration shall remain suspended until the applicant satisfies either of the following requirements:

(1) Documents to the satisfaction of the Labor Commissioner that he or she has satisfied all requirements imposed by a final judgment issued by a court or by a final order of the Labor Commissioner or by an accord involving unpaid wages.

(2) Files with the Labor Commissioner a notarized accord as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (c).

(e) (1) A licensee or registrant shall notify the Labor Commissioner in writing within 90 days of the date of a final judgment issued by a court, a final order issued by the Labor Commissioner, or an accord that imposes on the licensee or registrant
 requirements involving unpaid wages. If the licensee or registrant fails to comply with this notification requirement, the Labor Commissioner shall suspend the license or registration on the date that the Labor Commissioner is informed, or is made aware of, the judgment, order, or accord. The suspension shall remain in effect until the licensee or registrant satisfies either of the requirements described in subdivision (d).

(2) A licensee or registrant who notifies the Labor Commissioner of a judgment, order, or accord pursuant to paragraph (1), shall file with the notice a bond or a cash deposit meeting the criteria of paragraph (1) of subdivision (c).

(f) (1) The Labor Commissioner may reduce the amount of a bond or cash deposit required by this section upon proof, to the satisfaction of the Labor Commissioner, of partial satisfaction of the requirements
 imposed by a final judgment issued by a court, a final order issued by the Labor Commissioner, or an accord involving unpaid wages. The Labor Commissioner shall not reduce the bond or cash deposit amount below the balance of the entire amount involving unpaid wages. Upon full satisfaction of the requirements involving unpaid wages, the Labor Commissioner may terminate the bond or cash deposit requirement.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), within one year from the date of filing the bond or cash deposit pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (c) or paragraph (2) of subdivision (e), a licensee or registrant shall submit a notarized accord between the licensee or registrant and the other parties to the judgment, order, or accord demonstrating satisfaction of all requirements imposed by the judgment, order, or accord involving unpaid wages. The Labor Commissioner shall suspend the license or registration of a person who fails to file the
 notarized accord within that timeframe. Notwithstanding paragraph (1) of subdivision (c), a person who has failed to file a notarized accord within the timeframe required by this paragraph shall have his or her license or registration reinstated only after demonstrating that he or she has satisfied all requirements imposed by a final judgment, order, or accord involving unpaid wages. As an alternative to payment in full of all debts involving unpaid wages, a person may submit a notarized copy of an accord between the licensee or registrant and the other parties to the accord.

(g) The failure of a licensee or registrant to maintain a bond required by this section or to abide by all requirements imposed on a licensee or registrant by an accord involving unpaid wages between the licensee or registrant and the other parties to the accord shall result in the automatic suspension of his or her license or registration.

(h) (1) A licensee or registrant shall not allow a person who is a judgment debtor in a final judgment issued by a court or in a final order issued by the Labor Commissioner involving unpaid wages that imposes requirements that have not been satisfied in their entirety to serve in a capacity described in Section 1689 or subparagraph (B) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 2675.

(2) The Labor Commissioner shall suspend the license of a farm labor contractor or the registration of a garment manufacturer who violates the provisions of paragraph (1). The Labor Commissioner shall reinstate the license or registration upon the resignation of the person named as a judgment debtor or complete satisfaction of the unpaid wages requirements.

(i) A person whose license or registration is suspended
 pursuant to this section, who is denied issuance or reinstatement of a license or registration, or who has been assessed a civil penalty for knowingly providing false information in the statement required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) shall pay to the Labor Commissioner all reasonable costs incurred by the Labor Commissioner in all activities relating to the adverse license or registration action, commencing with the first notice issued by the Labor Commissioner that he or she has taken any adverse action under this section relative to a license or registration. The Labor Commissioner shall not reinstate a license or registration unless the person has paid all costs assessed by the Labor Commissioner or has entered into an accord with the Labor Commissioner that establishes a payment plan.

(j) This section shall not apply to an applicant for a farm labor contractor license or a garment manufacturer registration or to a licensee or
 registrant when the unpaid wages, as described by this section, have been discharged in a bankruptcy proceeding.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 151.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Elective Compensation Under The Inflation Reduction Act [280. - 281.]

280.

It is the intent of the Legislature to do all of the following:

(a) Facilitate the construction, rebuild, repowering, and repair of facilities that advance the state’s goals for the use of renewable energy in retail electricity sales including the use of tax incentives available to qualified projects and facilities pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169).

(b) Support Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169) provisions that promote the creation of high-paying clean energy jobs by authorizing larger tax incentives for taxpayers who voluntarily pay qualified clean energy project workers wages that are
 on par with regional prevailing wages. In furtherance of this
 goal, the act allows taxpayers to qualify for larger tax incentives by retroactively paying workers the difference between actual wages paid and the prevailing wage for the locality where the qualified project is located, plus interest and other penalties.

(c) Support taxpayers and employers who voluntarily pay higher wages to clean energy workers in order to qualify for the larger tax incentives provided by the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169) to shield those taxpayers and employers from penalties or litigation for so doing.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (SB 400)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repeal operative January 1, 2029, pursuant to Section 281.)
-------------------------------------------

281.

(a) (1) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a taxpayer, employer, contractor, or subcontractor may voluntarily make an elective or retroactive wage payment to workers who performed work on a qualified renewable clean energy facility pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of (Public Law 117-169).

(2) An elective retroactive wage payment made pursuant to paragraph (1) does not, by itself, constitute a violation of Sections 200 to 244, inclusive, Sections 500 to 558.1, inclusive, Sections 1171 to 1207, inclusive, or Sections 2698 to 2699.8, inclusive.

(b) For purposes of this article,
 “elective retroactive wage payment” means a payment to workers who performed work on a qualified renewable clean energy facility pursuant to provisions of the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169) that meets all of the following conditions:

(1) The renewable clean energy facility qualified for tax incentives pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169).

(2) The elective retroactive wage payment is voluntarily paid to workers for work they performed installing, modifying, repairing, or replacing solar panels, inverters, battery energy storage systems, transformers, and any associated components at a facility that is eligible for federal tax incentives under the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169), or regulations issued by
 the Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of the Treasury.

(3) The facility is not a public works project, as defined in Section 1720, and would not otherwise be subject to the requirements of the Davis-Bacon Act if the facility owner, employer, contractor, or subcontractor does not apply for the federal tax incentives available pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169), or pursuant to regulations issued by the Internal Revenue Service and the United States Department of the Treasury.

(4) The elective retroactive wage payment is made voluntarily by the taxpayer, contractor, subcontractor, or employer pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169) or regulations issued by the United States Department of the
 Treasury and Internal Revenue Service regarding wage requirements related to renewable electricity production tax incentives.

(5) The taxpayer, employer, contractor, or subcontractor’s elective retroactive wage payment to any worker for work
 performed on the renewable energy facility is solely for the purpose of the application of a taxpayer, employer, contractor, or subcontractor for federal tax incentives pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169), and is in addition to wages otherwise paid pursuant to applicable law.

(6) The taxpayer, employer, contractor, or subcontractor is in compliance with the applicable provisions of the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169), and the
 applicable Internal Revenue Service or United States Department of the Treasury guidance and regulations related to renewable electricity production tax incentives.

(c) This section does not apply to the following:

(1) Claims of retaliation, discrimination, or harassment.

(2) Claims for the willful classification or misclassification of employees as independent contractors.

(3) Violations of any other provision of law unrelated to the payment of retroactive prevailing wage payments in connection with the application for federal tax benefits pursuant to the Inflation Reduction Act of 2022 (Public Law 117-169).

(4) A taxpayer, employer, contractor, or subcontractor that has failed to pay, in full, wages otherwise due pursuant to applicable law, and has failed to cure any such violation.

(d) This section applies only to renewable energy facility construction or repairs commenced on or after January 1, 2023, that were completed on or before December 31, 2024.

(e) This section does not limit the authority of the Labor Commissioner to investigate
 or enforce this section or any other violations of this code.

(f) This article shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2029, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 220, Sec. 1.   (SB 400)   Effective October 1, 2025.   Repeal operative January 1, 2029, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Article 4, commencing with Section 280.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. Assignment of Wages [300. - 300.]

300.

(a) As used in this section, the phrase “assignment of wages” includes the sale or assignment of, or giving of an order for, wages or salary but does not include an order or assignment made pursuant to Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 5200) of Part 5 of Division 9 of the Family Code or Section 3088 of the Probate Code.

(b) No assignment of wages, earned or to be earned, is valid unless all of the following conditions are satisfied:

(1) The assignment is contained in a separate written instrument, signed by the person by whom the wages or salary have been earned or are to be earned, and identifying specifically the transaction to which the assignment relates.

(2) Where the assignment is made by a married person, the written consent of the spouse of the person making the assignment is attached to the assignment. No such consent is required of any married person (A) after entry of a judgment decreeing a legal separation from such person’s spouse or (B) if the married person and the spouse of the married person are living separate and apart after entry of an interlocutory judgment of dissolution of their marriage, if a written statement by the person making the assignment, setting forth such facts, is attached to or included in the assignment.

(3) Where the assignment is made by a minor, the written consent of a parent or guardian of the minor is attached to the assignment.

(4) Where the assignment is made by a person who is unmarried or who is an adult or who is both unmarried and an adult, a written statement by the person making the assignment, setting forth such facts, is attached to or included in the assignment.

(5) No other assignment exists in connection with the same transaction or series of transactions and a written statement by the person making the assignment to that effect is attached to or included in the assignment.

(6) A copy of the assignment and of the written statement provided for in paragraphs (2), (4), and (5), authenticated by a notary public, is filed with the employer, accompanied by an itemized statement of the amount then due to the assignee.

(7) At the time the assignment is filed with the employer, no other assignment of wages of the employee is subject to payment and no earnings withholding order against the employee’s wages or salary is in force.

(c) Under any assignment of wages, a sum not to exceed 50 per centum of the assignor’s wages or salary shall be withheld by, and be collectible from, the assignor’s employer at the time of each payment of such wages or salary.

(d) The employer is entitled to rely upon the statements of fact in the written statement provided for in paragraphs (2), (4), and (5) of subdivision (b), without the necessity of inquiring into the truth thereof, and the employer shall incur no liability whatsoever by reason of any payments made by the employer to an assignee under any assignment in reliance upon the facts so stated.

(e) An assignment of wages to be earned is revocable at any time by the maker thereof. Any power of attorney to assign or collect wages or salary is revocable at any time by the maker thereof. No revocation of such an assignment or power of attorney is effective as to the employer until the employer receives written notice of revocation from the maker.

(f) No assignment of wages, earned or to be earned, is valid under any circumstances if the wages or salary earned or to be earned are paid under a plan for payment at a central place or places established under the provisions of Section 204a.

(g) This section does not apply to deductions which the employer may be requested by the employee to make for the payment of life, retirement, disability or unemployment insurance premiums, for the payment of taxes owing from the employee, for contribution to funds, plans or systems providing for death, retirement, disability, unemployment, or other benefits, for the payment for goods or services furnished by the employer to the employee or the employee’s family at the request of the employee, or for charitable, educational, patriotic or similar purposes.

(h) No assignment of wages is valid unless at the time of the making thereof, such wages or salary have been earned, except for necessities of life and then only to the person or persons furnishing such necessities of life directly and then only for the amount needed to furnish such necessities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 163, Sec. 99.   Effective January 1, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 161 of Ch. 163.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 3. Privileges and Perquisites [350. - 452.]



  ARTICLE 1. Gratuities [350. - 356.]

350.

As used in this article, unless the context indicates otherwise:

(a) “Employer” means every person engaged in any business or enterprise in this state that has one or more persons in service under any appointment, contract of hire, or apprenticeship, express or implied, oral or written, irrespective of whether the person is the owner of the business or is operating on a concessionaire or other basis.

(b) “Employee” means every person, including minors and persons who are not citizens or nationals of the United States, rendering actual service in any business for an employer, whether gratuitously or for
 wages or pay, whether the wages or pay are measured by the standard of time, piece, task, commission, or other method of calculation, and whether the service is rendered on a commission, concessionaire, or other basis.

(c) “Employing” includes hiring, or in any way contracting for, the services of an employee.

(d) “Agent” means every person other than the employer having the authority to hire or discharge any employee or supervise, direct, or control the acts of employees.

(e) “Gratuity” includes any tip, gratuity, money, or part thereof that has been paid or given to or left for an employee by a patron of a business over and above the actual amount due the business for services rendered or for goods, food, drink, or
 articles sold or served to the patron. Any amounts paid directly by a patron to a dancer employed by an employer subject to Industrial Welfare Commission Order No. 5 or 10 shall be deemed a gratuity.

(f) “Business” means any business establishment or enterprise, regardless of where conducted.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 296, Sec. 38.   (AB 1096)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

351.

(a) No employer or agent shall collect, take, or receive any gratuity or a part thereof that is paid, given to, or left for an employee by a patron, or deduct any amount from wages due an employee on account of a gratuity, or require an employee to credit the amount, or any part thereof, of a gratuity against and as a part of the wages due the employee from the employer. Every gratuity is hereby declared to be the sole property of the employee or employees to whom it was paid, given, or left for. An employer that permits patrons to pay gratuities by credit card shall pay the employees the full amount of the gratuity that the patron indicated on the credit card slip, without any deductions for any credit card payment
 processing fees or costs that may be charged to the employer by the credit card company. Payment of gratuities made by patrons using credit cards shall be made to the employees not later than the next regular payday following the date the patron authorized the credit card payment.

(b) The Labor Commissioner may investigate and issue a citation or file a civil action for gratuities taken or withheld in violation of this section. If a citation is issued, the procedures for issuing, contesting, and enforcing judgments for citations and civil penalties issued by the Labor Commissioner shall be the same as those set out in Section 1197.1, as appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 93, Sec. 1.   (SB 648)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

353.

Every employer shall keep accurate records of all gratuities received by him, whether received directly from the employee or indirectly by means of deductions from the wages of the employee or otherwise. Such records shall be open to inspection at all reasonable hours by the department.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

354.

Any employer who violates any provision of this article is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by imprisonment for not exceeding 60 days, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 190.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

355.

The Department of Industrial Relations shall enforce the provisions of this article. All fines collected under this article shall be paid into the State treasury and credited to the general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

356.

The Legislature expressly declares that the purpose of this article is to prevent fraud upon the public in connection with the practice of tipping and declares that this article is passed for a public reason and can not be contravened by a private agreement. As a part of the social public policy of this State, this article is binding upon all departments of the State.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Bonds and Photographs [400. - 410.]

400.

As used in this article, “applicant” means an applicant for employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

401.

If a bond or photograph of an employee or applicant is required by any employer, the cost thereof shall be paid by the employer.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

402.

No employer shall demand, exact, or accept any cash bond from any employee or applicant unless:

(a) The employee or applicant is entrusted with property of an equivalent value, or

(b) The employer advances regularly to the employee goods, wares, or merchandise to be delivered or sold by the employee, and for which the employer is reimbursed by the employee at regular periodic intervals, and the employer limits the cash bond to an amount sufficient to cover the value of the goods, wares, or merchandise so advanced during the period prior to the payment therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

403.

If cash is received as a bond it shall be deposited in a savings account in a bank authorized to do business in this State, and may be withdrawn only upon the joint signatures of the employer and the employee or applicant.

Cash put up as a bond shall be accompanied by an agreement in writing made by the employer and employee or applicant, setting forth the conditions under which the bond is given.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

404.

Any money put up as a bond under Sections 401, 402 and 403:

(a) Is not subject to enforcement of a money judgment except in an action between the employer and the employee or applicant, or their successors or assigns. 

(b) Shall be returned to the employee or applicant together with accrued interest thereon, immediately upon the return of the money or property entrusted to the employee or applicant and upon the fulfillment of the agreement, subject only to the deduction necessary to balance accounts between the employer and employee or applicant.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1982, Ch. 497, Sec. 133.   Operative July 1, 1983, by Sec. 185 of Ch. 497.)
-------------------------------------------

405.

Any property put up by any employee or applicant as a bond shall not be used for any purpose other than liquidating accounts between the employer and employee or for return to the employee or applicant and shall be held in trust for this purpose and not mingled with the property of the employer. No contract between the employer and employee or applicant shall abrogate the provisions of this section. Any employer or prospective employer, or agent or officer thereof, who misappropriates any such property, mingles it with his own, or uses it for any other purpose than that herein set forth is guilty of theft and shall be punished in accordance with the provisions of the Penal Code relating to theft.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

406.

Any property put up by an employee, or applicant as a part of the contract of employment, directly or indirectly, shall be deemed to be put up as a bond and is subject to the provisions of this article whether the property is put up on a note or as a loan or an investment and regardless of the wording of the agreement under which it is put up.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

407.

Investments and the sale of stock or an interest in a business in connection with the securing of a position are illegal as against the public policy of the State and shall not be advertised or held out in any way as a part of the consideration for any employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

408.

Any person or agent or officer thereof, who violates any provision of this article, except the provisions of Section 405, is guilty of a misdemeanor, punishable by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) and not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisonment for not exceeding six months, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1092, Sec. 191.   Effective September 27, 1983.   Operative January 1, 1984, by Sec. 427 of Ch. 1092.)
-------------------------------------------

409.

All fines imposed and collected under this article shall be paid into the State treasury and credited to the general fund.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

410.

The Labor Commissioner shall enforce this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Contracts and Applications for Employment [430. - 435.]

430.

As used in this article “applicant” means an applicant for employment.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1937, Ch. 90.)
-------------------------------------------

432.

If an employee or applicant signs any instrument relating to the obtaining or holding of employment, he shall be given a copy of the instrument upon request.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 714.)
-------------------------------------------

432.2.

(a) No employer shall demand or require any applicant for employment or prospective employment or any employee to submit to or take a polygraph, lie detector or similar test or examination as a condition of employment or continued employment. The prohibition of this section does not apply to the federal government or any agency thereof or the state government or any agency or local subdivision thereof, including, but not limited to, counties, cities and counties, cities, districts, authorities, and agencies.

(b) No employer shall request any person to take such a test, or administer such a test, without first advising the person in writing at the time the test is to be administered of the rights guaranteed by this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 316, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

432.3.

(a) An employer shall not rely on the salary history information of an applicant for employment as a factor in determining whether to offer employment to an applicant or what salary to offer an applicant.

(b) An employer shall not, orally or in writing, personally or through an agent, seek salary history information, including compensation and benefits, about an applicant for employment.

(c) (1) An employer, upon reasonable request, shall provide the pay scale for a position to an applicant applying for employment.

(2) An employer, upon request,
 shall provide an employee the pay scale for the position in which the employee is currently employed.

(3) An employer with 15 or more employees shall include the pay scale for a position in any job posting.

(4) An employer shall maintain records of a job title and wage rate history for each employee for the duration of the employment plus three years after the end of the employment in order for the Labor Commissioner to determine if there is still a pattern of wage discrepancy. These records shall be open to inspection by the Labor Commissioner.

(5) An employer with 15 or more employees that engages a third party to announce, post, publish, or otherwise make known a job posting shall provide the pay scale to the
 third party. The third party shall include the pay scale in the job posting.

(d) (1) A person who claims to be aggrieved by a violation of this section may file a written complaint with the Labor Commissioner within one year after the date the person learned of the violation. The complaint shall state the name and address of the employer and shall provide a detailed account of the alleged violation, as may be required by the Labor Commissioner.

(2) A person who claims to be aggrieved by a violation of this section may also bring a civil action for injunctive relief and any other relief that the court deems appropriate.

(3) The Labor Commissioner shall promptly investigate complaints alleging violation
 of this section.

(4) Upon finding that an employer has violated this section, the Labor Commissioner may order the employer to pay a civil penalty of no less than one hundred dollars ($100) and no more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per violation. The Labor Commissioner shall determine the amount of the penalty based on the totality of the circumstances, including, but not limited to, whether the employer has previously violated this section. For a first violation of subdivision (c), no penalty shall be assessed upon demonstration by the employer that all job postings for open positions have been updated to include the pay scale as required by this section.

(5) If an employer fails to keep records in violation of this section, there shall be a rebuttable presumption in favor of the
 employee’s claim.

(e) Section 433 does not apply to this section.

(f) This section does not apply to salary history information disclosable to the public pursuant to federal or state law, including the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) or the federal Freedom of Information Act (Section 552 of Title 5 of the United States Code).

(g) This section applies to all employers, including state and local government employers and the Legislature.

(h) Nothing in this section shall prohibit an applicant from voluntarily and without prompting disclosing salary history information to a
 prospective employer.
